third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/tg_TG.aff
FLAG num
SFX 244 N 11
SFX 244 0 гиҳо .
SFX 244 0 гиҳову .
SFX 244 0 гиҳои .
SFX 244 0 гиҳоро .
SFX 244 0 гиҳост .
SFX 244 0 гиҳою .
SFX 244 0 гиҳоям .
SFX 244 0 гиҳоямро .
SFX 244 0 гиҳоятонро .
SFX 244 0 гиҳояш .
SFX 244 0 гиҳояшон .

SFX 245 N 3
SFX 245 0 гиҳое .
SFX 245 0 гиҳоеро .
SFX 245 0 гиҳоест .

SFX 246 N 2
SFX 246 0 гие .
SFX 246 0 гиеро .

SFX 247 N 3
SFX 247 0 гиён .
SFX 247 0 гиёни .
SFX 247 0 гиёнро .

SFX 248 N 11
SFX 248 0 гин .
SFX 248 0 гинам .
SFX 248 0 гинаму .
SFX 248 0 гинатон .
SFX 248 0 гинаш .
SFX 248 0 гинашон .
SFX 248 0 гинашро .
SFX 248 0 гинем .
SFX 248 0 гини .
SFX 248 0 гинро .
SFX 248 0 гину .

SFX 249 N 5
SFX 249 0 гинӣ .
SFX 249 0 гиниву .
SFX 249 0 гинии .
SFX 249 0 гиниро .
SFX 249 0 гинию .

SFX 250 N 1
SFX 250 0 гине .

SFX 251 N 1
SFX 251 0 гиниеро .

SFX 252 N 2
SFX 252 0 гинона .
SFX 252 0 гинонаи .

SFX 253 N 1
SFX 253 0 гинтар .

SFX 254 N 16
SFX 254 0 гоҳ .
SFX 254 0 гоҳам .
SFX 254 0 гоҳамон .
SFX 254 0 гоҳамро .
SFX 254 0 гоҳанду .
SFX 254 0 гоҳат .
SFX 254 0 гоҳатон .
SFX 254 0 гоҳатонро .
SFX 254 0 гоҳатро .
SFX 254 0 гоҳаш .
SFX 254 0 гоҳашон .
SFX 254 0 гоҳашонро .
SFX 254 0 гоҳашро .
SFX 254 0 гоҳи .
SFX 254 0 гоҳро .
SFX 254 0 гоҳу .

SFX 255 N 8
SFX 255 0 гоҳҳо .
SFX 255 0 гоҳҳову .
SFX 255 0 гоҳҳои .
SFX 255 0 гоҳҳоро .
SFX 255 0 гоҳҳост .
SFX 255 0 гоҳҳоямон .
SFX 255 0 гоҳҳояш .
SFX 255 0 гоҳҳояшон .

SFX 256 N 2
SFX 256 0 гоҳҳое .
SFX 256 0 гоҳҳоест .

SFX 257 N 3
SFX 257 0 гоҳӣ .
SFX 257 0 гоҳиро .
SFX 257 0 гоҳию .

SFX 258 N 3
SFX 258 0 гоҳе .
SFX 258 0 гоҳеро .
SFX 258 0 гоҳест .

SFX 259 N 1
SFX 259 0 гоҳон .

SFX 261 N 15
SFX 261 0 гонӣ .
SFX 261 0 гониамон .
SFX 261 0 гониат .
SFX 261 0 гониаш .
SFX 261 0 гониашон .
SFX 261 0 гониашонро .
SFX 261 0 гониву .
SFX 261 0 гонии .
SFX 261 0 гониро .
SFX 261 0 гонист .
SFX 261 0 гонию .
SFX 261 0 гониям .
SFX 261 0 гоният .
SFX 261 0 гонияш .
SFX 261 0 гонияшон .

SFX 262 N 15
SFX 262 0 гона .
SFX 262 0 гонаам .
SFX 262 0 гонаамро .
SFX 262 0 гонаанд .
SFX 262 0 гонаат .
SFX 262 0 гонаатон .
SFX 262 0 гонаатонро .
SFX 262 0 гонаатро .
SFX 262 0 гонааш .
SFX 262 0 гонаашон .
SFX 262 0 гонаашро .
SFX 262 0 гонаву .
SFX 262 0 гонаи .
SFX 262 0 гонаро .
SFX 262 0 гонаю .

SFX 263 N 5
SFX 263 0 гонаҳо .
SFX 263 0 гонаҳои .
SFX 263 0 гонаҳоро .
SFX 263 0 гонаҳоям .
SFX 263 0 гонаҳояш .

SFX 264 N 1
SFX 264 0 гонаиву .

SFX 265 N 3
SFX 265 0 гонагӣ .
SFX 265 0 гонагии .
SFX 265 0 гонагиро .

SFX 266 N 2
SFX 266 0 гонае .
SFX 266 0 гонаеро .

SFX 268 N 2
SFX 268 0 гониҳо .
SFX 268 0 гониҳои .

SFX 269 N 2
SFX 269 0 гониҳое .
SFX 269 0 гониҳоеанд .

SFX 270 N 1
SFX 270 0 гоние .

SFX 271 N 1
SFX 271 0 гоник .

SFX 272 N 1
SFX 272 0 гоникҳо .

SFX 273 N 1
SFX 273 0 гонон .

SFX 274 N 18
SFX 274 0 гор .
SFX 274 0 горам .
SFX 274 0 горамон .
SFX 274 0 горамонро .
SFX 274 0 горамро .
SFX 274 0 горанд .
SFX 274 0 горат .
SFX 274 0 горатон .
SFX 274 0 горатро .
SFX 274 0 гораш .
SFX 274 0 горашон .
SFX 274 0 горашонро .
SFX 274 0 горашро .
SFX 274 0 горед .
SFX 274 0 горем .
SFX 274 0 гори .
SFX 274 0 горро .
SFX 274 0 гору .

SFX 275 N 6
SFX 275 0 горҳо .
SFX 275 0 горҳои .
SFX 275 0 горҳоро .
SFX 275 0 горҳояшон .
SFX 275 0 горҳояшонро .
SFX 275 0 горҳояшро .

SFX 276 N 13
SFX 276 0 горӣ .
SFX 276 0 гориам .
SFX 276 0 гориамро .
SFX 276 0 гориат .
SFX 276 0 гориаш .
SFX 276 0 гориашон .
SFX 276 0 гориашро .
SFX 276 0 гориву .
SFX 276 0 гории .
SFX 276 0 гориро .
SFX 276 0 горист .
SFX 276 0 горию .
SFX 276 0 горияш .

SFX 277 N 1
SFX 277 0 гора .

SFX 278 N 1
SFX 278 0 горагӣ .

SFX 279 N 1
SFX 279 0 горае .

SFX 280 N 3
SFX 280 0 горе .
SFX 280 0 гореро .
SFX 280 0 горест .

SFX 281 N 4
SFX 281 0 гориҳо .
SFX 281 0 гориҳову .
SFX 281 0 гориҳои .
SFX 281 0 гориҳояшро .

SFX 282 N 1
SFX 282 0 гориҳое .

SFX 283 N 1
SFX 283 0 горо .

SFX 284 N 1
SFX 284 0 горов .

SFX 285 N 1
SFX 285 0 горова .

SFX 286 N 9
SFX 286 0 горон .
SFX 286 0 горонанд .
SFX 286 0 горонатро .
SFX 286 0 горонаш .
SFX 286 0 горонашонро .
SFX 286 0 горонем .
SFX 286 0 горони .
SFX 286 0 горонро .
SFX 286 0 горону .

SFX 287 N 2
SFX 287 0 горона .
SFX 287 0 горонаи .

SFX 288 N 2
SFX 288 0 гороне .
SFX 288 0 горонеро .

SFX 289 N 1
SFX 289 0 гортар .

SFX 290 N 2
SFX 290 0 гортарин .
SFX 290 0 гортарини .

SFX 291 N 10
SFX 291 0 гун .
SFX 291 0 гунам .
SFX 291 0 гунамро .
SFX 291 0 гунаст .
SFX 291 0 гунат .
SFX 291 0 гунаш .
SFX 291 0 гунашро .
SFX 291 0 гуни .
SFX 291 0 гунро .
SFX 291 0 гуну .

SFX 292 N 1
SFX 292 0 гунҳои .

SFX 293 N 5
SFX 293 0 гунӣ .
SFX 293 0 гуниву .
SFX 293 0 гунии .
SFX 293 0 гуниро .
SFX 293 0 гунию .

SFX 294 N 4
SFX 294 0 гуна .
SFX 294 0 гунааш .
SFX 294 0 гунаву .
SFX 294 0 гунаи .

SFX 295 N 2
SFX 295 0 гунагӣ .
SFX 295 0 гунагии .

SFX 296 N 1
SFX 296 0 гунае .

SFX 297 N 2
SFX 297 0 гунатар .
SFX 297 0 гунатари .

SFX 298 N 3
SFX 298 0 гуниҳо .
SFX 298 0 гуниҳои .
SFX 298 0 гуниҳоро .

SFX 299 N 2
SFX 299 0 гуниҳое .
SFX 299 0 гуниҳоеро .

SFX 300 N 2
SFX 300 0 гуние .
SFX 300 0 гуниеро .

SFX 301 N 1
SFX 301 0 гунтар .

SFX 302 N 17
SFX 302 0 дон .
SFX 302 0 донам .
SFX 302 0 донамон .
SFX 302 0 донамонро .
SFX 302 0 донамро .
SFX 302 0 донанд .
SFX 302 0 донат .
SFX 302 0 донатон .
SFX 302 0 донатонро .
SFX 302 0 донаш .
SFX 302 0 донашон .
SFX 302 0 донашонро .
SFX 302 0 донашро .
SFX 302 0 донем .
SFX 302 0 дони .
SFX 302 0 донро .
SFX 302 0 дону .

SFX 303 N 3
SFX 303 0 донҳо .
SFX 303 0 донҳои .
SFX 303 0 донҳоро .

SFX 304 N 2
SFX 304 0 донӣ .
SFX 304 0 донии .

SFX 305 N 3
SFX 305 0 доне .
SFX 305 0 донеро .
SFX 305 0 донест .

SFX 306 N 1
SFX 306 0 дончаи .

SFX 307 N 1
SFX 307 0 дор .

SFX 309 N 3
SFX 309 0 ё .
SFX 309 0 ёи .
SFX 309 0 ёст .

SFX 310 N 2
SFX 310 0 ёии .
SFX 310 0 ёист .

SFX 311 N 4
SFX 311 0 ев .
SFX 311 0 еваш .
SFX 311 0 еви .
SFX 311 0 евро .

SFX 312 N 1
SFX 312 0 евҳо .

SFX 313 N 3
SFX 313 0 ева .
SFX 313 0 еваи .
SFX 313 0 еваро .

SFX 314 N 1
SFX 314 0 евич .

SFX 315 N 2
SFX 315 0 евна .
SFX 315 0 евнаи .

SFX 316 N 1
SFX 316 0 еде .

SFX 318 N 1
SFX 318 0 ёнӣ .

SFX 319 N 8
SFX 319 0 ёна .
SFX 319 0 ёнаанд .
SFX 319 0 ёнааш .
SFX 319 0 ёнаашон .
SFX 319 0 ёнаву .
SFX 319 0 ёнаи .
SFX 319 0 ёнаро .
SFX 319 0 ёнаю .

SFX 320 N 1
SFX 320 0 ёнаҳои .

SFX 321 N 1
SFX 321 0 ёнае .

SFX 322 N 1
SFX 322 0 ёнанда .

SFX 323 N 3
SFX 323 0 ёнд .
SFX 323 0 ёндам .
SFX 323 0 ёнданд .

SFX 324 N 1
SFX 324 0 ёндӣ .

SFX 325 N 6
SFX 325 0 ёнда .
SFX 325 0 ёндаанд .
SFX 325 0 ёндааш .
SFX 325 0 ёндаашонро .
SFX 325 0 ёндаи .
SFX 325 0 ёндаро .

SFX 326 N 2
SFX 326 0 ёндан .
SFX 326 0 ёндани .

SFX 327 N 1
SFX 327 0 ёнданианд .

SFX 329 N 1
SFX 329 0 ёниҳо .

SFX 330 N 4
SFX 330 0 ёнид .
SFX 330 0 ёнидам .
SFX 330 0 ёниданд .
SFX 330 0 ёнидем .

SFX 331 N 7
SFX 331 0 ёнида .
SFX 331 0 ёнидаанд .
SFX 331 0 ёнидаашонро .
SFX 331 0 ёнидаашро .
SFX 331 0 ёнидаем .
SFX 331 0 ёнидаи .
SFX 331 0 ёнидаӣ .

SFX 332 N 1
SFX 332 0 ёнидаиву .

SFX 333 N 2
SFX 333 0 ёнидан .
SFX 333 0 ёнидани .

SFX 334 N 8
SFX 334 0 ёт .
SFX 334 0 ёташ .
SFX 334 0 ёташон .
SFX 334 0 ёташонро .
SFX 334 0 ёташро .
SFX 334 0 ёти .
SFX 334 0 ётро .
SFX 334 0 ёту .

SFX 335 N 1
SFX 335 0 ётар .

SFX 336 N 1
SFX 336 0 ёте .

SFX 337 N 10
SFX 337 0 зор .
SFX 337 0 зорам .
SFX 337 0 зорат .
SFX 337 0 зоратро .
SFX 337 0 зораш .
SFX 337 0 зорашон .
SFX 337 0 зорему .
SFX 337 0 зори .
SFX 337 0 зорро .
SFX 337 0 зору .

SFX 338 N 5
SFX 338 0 зорҳо .
SFX 338 0 зорҳову .
SFX 338 0 зорҳои .
SFX 338 0 зорҳоро .
SFX 338 0 зорҳояш .

SFX 339 N 1
SFX 339 0 зориаш .

SFX 340 N 1
SFX 340 0 зорбон .

SFX 341 N 3
SFX 341 0 зоре .
SFX 341 0 зореро .
SFX 341 0 зорест .

SFX 342 N 5
SFX 342 0 зорон .
SFX 342 0 зоронаш .
SFX 342 0 зорони .
SFX 342 0 зоронро .
SFX 342 0 зорону .

SFX 343 N 1
SFX 343 0 ии .
