third_party/hunspell_dictionaries/tg_TG.dic
ҳақрӯ/318
ҷома/25,857,5,7,195,197,9,223,302,305,306,29,859,569,14,787,16
ҷудо/852,4,9,223,262,265,266,29,11,859,344,853,402,855,862,856,846,860,16,18,20,24
ғам/25,852,64,2,857,5,6,7,8,147,248,249,251,252,29,11,859,421,853,531,569,572,577,31,14,15
андӯҳ/25,2,5,7,8,147,223,248,250,249,252,29,859,539,569,14,15
бӯ/25,852,9,248,29,309,310,333,335,859,366,369,382,421,16,17,822,18,20,831,838,21,23
бозор/25,852,1,68,75,77,2,4,5,6,7,8,254,28,261,273,29,859,344,862,409,855,853,584,586,597,14,15,786,787,789,793,810,811,813
бразилия/244
гул/25,33,852,64,75,2,4,5,7,8,140,145,147,291,294,293,301,302,303,305,29,11,337,338,340,341,859,346,404,855,453,454,457,552,569,584,586,31,14,15,775,776,789,816
дармон/25,852,1,2,7,229,254,255,257,29,859,855,655,14,15
дигар/25,852,2,3,857,4,5,7,8,291,292,293,294,295,297,298,299,300,29,859,853,580,31,14,722,742,15
дидбон/25,852,7,254,255,256,29,859,31
ёд/25,68,2,3,857,5,6,7,8,165,198,203,274,276,280,281,282,284,285,286,29,859,15
зинда/25,852,2,4,858,7,9,28,261,268,270,29,10,11,859,853,14,846,742,16,18
зироат/25,852,7,8,254,29,859,862,853,855,14,15
зо/30,322,326,333,859,366,369,370,374,382,474,489,496,17,20,831
зод/35,49,58,2,94,4,254,258,261,10,859,862,546,15
ид/25,2,5,6,8,147,163,224,254,255,29,859,862,404,855,580,627,633,14,15
ист/1,2,4,104,7,254,255,258,10,11,12,859,853,580,655,650,661,669,14,15
киса/25,2,5,6,7,8,9,223,246,29,859,14,787,789
ком/25,64,2,3,5,7,163,170,274,276,281,283,286,29,859,14,15
лаблабу/223,248,29,337,859,14,16
латта/25,9,223,248,250,29,859,14,789,16
лаъл/25,64,2,5,7,147,175,229,291,294,29,552,696,14,722,15,775
маҷор/852,343,453
мабраз/25,255,256,859
мадад/25,5,7,8,274,275,276,280,286,29,859,15
мактаббача/25,28,262
марғ/852,29,337,338,341,342,15
маснави/25,7,291,294,29,334,859,14,778,16
мон/1,2,4,104,109,842,7,10,316,11,31,649,651,655,15
нав/25,852,70,2,3,857,98,4,5,6,7,8,261,268,269,270,29,10,11,859,344,421,436,439,853,580,14,723,742,752,15,787
наззора/25,2,7,9,223,229,247,254,28,859,853,813
намоянда/223,244,28,29,859
нарӯ/30,330,333,366,369,382,17
нов/64,302,303,859,382,14,15,787
нодира/25,33,302,859,14,777
норасо/852,223,244,245,246,344,345,853,402,855,14,846,861
нос/25,5,8,195,302,305,859,344,853,855,14,15
носоз/852,7,274,276,280,281,287,29,859,344,855,627
об/25,852,68,78,82,64,2,3,857,4,5,6,7,8,229,254,291,302,305,29,10,338,341,337,859,344,853,402,409,855,453,862,856,863,555,569,14,15,786,787,810,813
омӯз/852,1,2,839,4,104,109,112,274,276,280,286,288,10,11,382,474,475,477,496,497,500,503,505,862,31,636,649,650,651,655,661,663,669,671,15
ормонгаро/319
осударӯз/274
парҳез/852,1,2,237,274,276,280,281,286,287,290,29,859,382,855,853,627,633,14,15
парто/852,9,10,11,326,474,862,17,18,20,831
партов/25,852,36,7,8,254,255,258,859,14,15
пой/25,224,254,255,257,258,302,859,366,369,382,14,787,789,23
рӯ/25,852,9,229,29,309,30,324,325,326,323,327,330,331,333,859,366,369,382,386,388,14,846,16,17,824,822,18,19,861,20,831,833,837,21,22,23,24,332
рӯз/25,852,64,70,75,2,3,857,5,6,7,8,140,274,276,280,283,286,288,291,29,859,426,421,552,31,627,628,14,759,15
раҳимберди/314,16
расм/25,852,857,94,5,7,302,304,29,859,862,853,402,414,855,856,569,14,15
себанд/307
сим/25,2,5,7,147,291,294,296,29,859,855,421,426,451,14,15
сифла/9,223,28,262,859,14
сури/9,30,318,329,16
тӯ/852,29,319,320,321,859,16,18,19,20,851,21,23
тӯти/25,195,29,309,311,30,859,777,16
табии/4,7,8,9,29,334,859,14,846,742,16,20,23
табоҳрӯз/274
таваллуд/2,5,6,7,8,229,254,29,859,14,15
такя/25,7,140,224,254,255,257,258,859
тараққи/334,336,859,14,846,16
тира/25,33,2,4,9,223,244,246,254,291,29,859,14,742,759,775,16
тоза/2,857,4,7,8,9,223,245,244,29,859,14,846,742,744,752,16
тухм/25,852,35,36,58,75,64,7,8,302,303,29,859,344,853,855,862,863,552,569,14,15,811
хӯҷа/25,311,312,313,314,859,14
халифа/25,9,223,231,28,29,311,312,313,859,14,16
хашм/4,5,7,248,249,252,253,29,859,421,569,601,14,759,15
хидмат/25,852,2,4,5,6,7,8,229,274,276,280,286,29,859,855,862,627,14,15
хизмат/25,852,3,857,4,5,6,7,8,274,275,280,276,286,287,288,29,859,862,853,402,409,855,863,627,14,15,786,810,813,815
химча/25,7,9,223,248,29,859,552,16
хоҷа/25,2,5,7,9,223,246,28,29,311,312,313,859,14
хоса/25,7,9,223,246,247,28,29,859,14,752,16
хушрӯз/852,2,276,274,344,855,862,853,15
чормағз/64,7,29,337,338,859,855,14,15
шерали/9,311,313,315,859,14,777
эргашбо/311,313
янтоқ/29,337,859
